Washington statutes.
RCW 27.24.070

Portion of filing fees for county or regional law library.

In each county pursuant to this chapter, the county treasurer shall deposit in the county or regional law library fund a sum equal to seventeen dollars for every new probate or civil filing fee, including appeals and for every fee for filing a counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim in any civil action, collected by the clerk of the superior court and seven dollars for every fee collected for the commencement of a civil action and for the filing of a counterclaim, cross-claim, or third-party claim in any civil action in district court for the support of the law library in that county or the regional law library to which the county belongs: PROVIDED, That upon a showing of need the seventeen dollar contribution may be increased up to twenty dollars or in counties with multiple library sites up to thirty dollars upon the request of the law library board of trustees and with the approval of the county legislative body or bodies.

[ 2005 c 457 s 16; 1992 c 54 s 6; 1985 c 389 s 2; 1984 c 258 s 310; 1979 c 126 s 1; 1971 ex.s. c 141 s 3; 1969 c 25 s 2; 1961 c 304 s 9; 1957 c 31 s 1; 1953 c 249 s 1. Prior: (i) 1937 c 32 s 1, part; 1919 c 84 s 8, part; RRS s 8254, part. (ii) 1933 c 167 s 2, part; 1925 ex.s. c 94 s 3, part; RRS s 8254-3, part. (iii) 1943 c 195 s 2; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 8254-9.]

NOTES:

Intent—2005 c 457: See note following RCW 43.08.250.

Effective date—1992 c 54: See note following RCW 36.18.020.

Effective date—1985 c 389: "Sections 2 through 9 of this act are necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, the support of the state government and its existing public institutions, and shall take effect July 1, 1985." [ 1985 c 389 s 10.]

Court Improvement Act of 1984—Effective dates—Severability—Short title—1984 c 258: See notes following RCW 3.30.010.

Intent—1984 c 258: See note following RCW 3.34.130.

County clerk's fees: RCW 36.18.020.

District courts, filing fees in civil cases: RCW 3.62.060.